California statutes. Education Code
(c) Using available funding apportioned to their community college district pursuant to Section 84750.4, community colleges enrolling high school pupils through dual or concurrent enrollment pursuant to Sections 48800 and 76001, shall use eTranscript California, also referred to as “eTranscriptCA,” or its successor system, to enable the uniform integration of the pupil’s completed courses and grades received into the pupil’s universal and electronic high school transcript that is housed on the CaliforniaColleges.edu platform.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 93.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Rights of Students [76230. - 76234.]

76230.

Any currently enrolled or former student has a right to access to any and all student records relating to him maintained by community colleges. The editing or withholding of any such records, except as provided for in this chapter, is prohibited.

Each community college district shall adopt procedures for the granting of requests by students to inspect and review records during regular school hours, provided that access shall be granted no later than 15 working days following the date of the request. Procedures shall include notification of the location of all official student records if not centrally located and the providing of qualified personnel to interpret records where appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

76231.

A student may waive his or her right to access to student records devoted solely to confidential recommendations for career placement, postsecondary admission, or the receipt of an honor or honorary recognition. However, the recommendations shall be used solely for the purpose for which they were specifically intended, and the student shall be notified, upon request, of the names of all persons making confidential recommendations. A waiver may not be required as a condition for admission to, receipt of financial aid from, or receipt of any other services or benefits from a community college.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 92.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

76232.

(a) Any student may file a written request with the chief administrative officer of a community college district to correct or remove information recorded in his or her student records which the student alleges to be: (1) inaccurate; (2) an unsubstantiated personal conclusion or inference; (3) a conclusion or inference outside of the observer’s area of competence; or (4) not based on the personal observation of a named person with the time and place of the observation noted.

(b) Within 30 days of receipt of the request, the chief administrative officer, or his or her designee, shall meet with the student and the employee who recorded the information in question, if any, if the employee is presently employed by the community college district. The chief administrative officer or his or her designee shall then sustain or deny the allegations.

If the chief administrative officer, or his or her designee, sustains any or all of the allegations, he or she shall order the correction or removal and destruction of the information.

If the chief administrative officer, or his or her designee, denies any or all of the allegations and refuses to order the correction or removal of the information, the student, within 30 days of the refusal, may appeal the decision in writing to the governing board of the community college district.

(c) Within 30 days of receipt of an appeal, the governing board shall, in closed session with the student and the employee who recorded the information in question, if any, and if that employee is presently employed by the community college district, determine whether to sustain or deny the allegations.

If the governing board sustains any or all of the allegations, it shall order the chief administrative officer, or his or her designee, to immediately correct or remove and destroy the information.

The decision of the governing board shall be final.

Records of these administrative proceedings shall be maintained in a confidential manner and shall be destroyed one year after the decision of the governing board unless the student initiates legal proceedings relative to the disputed information within the prescribed period.

(d) If the final decision of the governing board is unfavorable to the student or if the student accepts an unfavorable decision by the chief administrative officer, the student shall have the right to submit a written statement of his or her objections to the information. This statement shall become a part of the student’s record until the information objected to is corrected or removed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 93.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

76233.

Whenever there is included in any student record information concerning any disciplinary action taken by community college personnel in connection with the student, the student shall be allowed to include in such record a written statement or response concerning the disciplinary action.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

76234.

Whenever there is included in any student record information concerning any disciplinary action taken by a community college in connection with any alleged sexual assault or physical abuse, including rape, forced sodomy, forced oral copulation, rape by a foreign object, sexual battery, or threat of sexual assault, or any conduct that threatens the health and safety of the alleged victim, the alleged victim of that sexual assault or physical abuse shall be informed within three days of the results of any disciplinary action by the community college and the results of any appeal. The alleged victim shall keep the results of that disciplinary action and appeal confidential.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 135.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Privacy of Student Records [76240. - 76246.]

76240.

(a) (1) Community college districts shall adopt a policy identifying those categories of directory information, as defined under Section 1232g of Title 20 of the United States Code as it exists on January 1, 2006, that may be released. The names and addresses of students may be provided to a private school or college operating under Sections 8080 to 8093, inclusive, Sections 33190 and 33191, or Sections 94000 to 94409, inclusive, or its authorized representative. However, no private school or college shall use this information for other than purposes directly related to the academic or professional goals of the institution.

(2) Any violation of this subdivision is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), and, in addition, the privilege of the school or college to receive this information shall be suspended for a period of two years from the time of discovery of the misuse of the information.

(b) Any community college district may limit or deny the release of specific categories of directory information based upon a determination of the best interests of students.

(c) Directory information may be released according to local policy as to any former student or any student currently attending the community college. However, public notice shall be given at least annually of the categories of information that the district plans to release and of the recipients. No directory information shall be released regarding any student or former student when the student or former student has notified the institution that the information shall not be released.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 12.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

76241.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude a community college from providing, in its discretion, statistical data from which no student may be identified to any public agency or entity or private nonprofit college, university, or educational research and development organization when such actions would be in the best educational interests of students.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

76242.

A community college district may permit access to student records to any person for whom the student has executed written consent specifying the records to be released and identifying the party or class of parties to whom the records may be released. The recipient must be notified that the transmission of the information to others without the written consent of the student is prohibited. The consent notice shall be permanently kept with the record file.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

76243.

(a) A community college or community college district is not authorized to permit access to student records to any person without the written consent of the student or unless pursuant to judicial order, except that access may be permitted to the following:

(1) Officials and employees of the community college, if they have a legitimate educational interest to inspect a record.

(2) Authorized representatives of the Comptroller General of the United States, the Secretary of Health, Education, and Welfare, an administrative head of an education agency, state education officials, or their respective designees or the United
 States Office of Civil Rights, where that information is necessary to audit or evaluate a state or federally supported education program or pursuant to a federal or state law, except that when the collection of personally identifiable information is specifically authorized by federal law, any data collected by those officials shall be protected in a manner that will not permit the personal identification of students or their parents by other than those officials, and any personally identifiable data shall be destroyed when no longer needed for that audit, evaluation, and enforcement of federal legal requirements.

(3) Other state and local officials or authorities to the extent that information is specifically required to be reported pursuant to state law adopted prior to November 19, 1974.

(4) Officials of other public or private schools or school systems, including local, county,
 or state correctional facilities where educational programs are provided, where the student seeks or intends to enroll, or is directed to enroll, subject to the rights of students as provided in Section 76225.

(5) Agencies or organizations in connection with a student’s application for, or receipt of, financial aid, provided that information permitting the personal identification of students may be disclosed only as may be necessary for those purposes as to determine the eligibility of the student for financial aid, to determine the amount of the financial aid, to determine the conditions that will be imposed regarding the financial aid, or to enforce the terms or conditions of the financial aid.

(6) Accrediting organizations in order to carry out their accrediting functions.

(7) Organizations conducting studies for,
 or on behalf of, educational agencies or institutions for the purpose of developing, validating, or administering predictive tests, administering student aid programs, and improving instruction, if those studies are conducted in such a manner as will not permit the personal identification of students or their parents by persons other than representatives of those organizations and the information will be destroyed when no longer needed for the purpose for which it is conducted.

(8) (A) Appropriate persons in connection with an emergency if the knowledge of that information is necessary to protect the health or safety of a student or other persons, or subject to any regulations issued by the Secretary of Health, Education, and Welfare.

(B) A person, persons, agency, or organization permitted access to student records pursuant to this section shall not permit
 access to any information obtained from those records by any other person, persons, agency, or organization, except to the extent permitted under the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g) and state law, without the written consent of the student, provided that this subparagraph shall not require prior student consent when information obtained pursuant to this section is shared with other persons within the educational institution, agency or organization obtaining access, so long as those persons have a legitimate educational interest in the information.

(b) The alleged victim of any sexual assault or physical abuse, including rape, forced sodomy, forced oral copulation, rape by a foreign object, sexual battery, or threat or assault, or any conduct that threatens the health and safety of the alleged victim, which is the basis of any disciplinary action taken by a community college, shall be permitted access to
 that information. For the purposes of this subdivision, access to student record information shall be in the form of notice of the results of any disciplinary action by the community college and the results of any appeal, which shall be provided to the alleged victim within three days following that disciplinary action or appeal. The alleged victim shall keep the results of that disciplinary action and appeal confidential.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 7, Sec. 38.   (SB 70)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

76244.

Information concerning a student shall be furnished in compliance with a court order or a lawfully issued subpoena. The community college district shall make a reasonable effort to notify the student in advance of compliance with a lawfully issued subpoena and, in the case of compliance with a court order, if lawfully possible within the requirements of the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 879, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

76245.

The service of a lawfully issued subpoena or a court order upon a community college employee solely for the purpose of causing the employee to produce a school record pertaining to any student may be complied with by that employee, in lieu of the personal appearance as a witness in the proceeding, by submitting to the court, or other agency or person designated in the subpoena, at the time and place required by the subpoena or court order, a copy of that record, accompanied by an affidavit certifying that the copy is a true copy of the original record on file in the community college or community college office. The copy of the record shall be in the form of a photostat, microfilm, microcard, or miniature photograph or other photographic copy or reproduction, or an enlargement thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 879, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

76246.

The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall adopt appropriate rules and regulations to insure the orderly implementation of this chapter. A community college district governing board may adopt rules and regulations which are not inconsistent with this chapter or with those adopted by the board of governors in order to ensure the orderly implementation of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Fees [76300. - 76396.4.]



  ARTICLE 1. Enrollment Fees and Financial Aid [76300. - 76303.]

76300.

(a) The governing board of each community college district shall charge each student a fee pursuant to this section.

(b) (1) The fee prescribed by this section shall be forty-six dollars ($46) per unit per semester, effective with the summer term of the 2012 calendar year.

(2) The board of governors shall proportionately adjust the amount of the fee for term lengths based upon a quarter system, and also shall proportionately adjust the amount of the fee for summer sessions, intersessions, and other short-term courses. In making these adjustments, the board of governors may round the per unit fee and the per term or per session fee to the nearest dollar.

(c) For the purposes of computing apportionments to community college districts pursuant to Section 84750.4 or 84750.5, as applicable, the board of governors shall subtract, from the total revenue owed to each district, 98 percent of the revenues received by districts from charging a fee pursuant to this section.

(d) The board of governors shall reduce apportionments by up to 10 percent to any district that does not collect the fees prescribed by this section.

(e) The fee requirement does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Students enrolled in the noncredit courses designated by Section 84757.

(2) California State University or University of California students enrolled in pretransfer
 classes provided by a community college district on a campus of the University of California or a campus of the California State University, for whom the district claims an attendance apportionment pursuant to an agreement between the district and the California State University or the University of California.

(3) Students enrolled in credit contract education courses pursuant to Section 78021, if the entire cost of the course, including administrative costs, is paid by the public or private agency, corporation, or association with which the district is contracting and if these students are not included in the calculation of the full-time equivalent students (FTES) of that district.

(f) The governing board of a community college district may exempt special part-time students admitted pursuant to Section 76001 from the fee requirement.

(g) (1) The fee requirements of this section shall be waived for any student who meets all of the following requirements:

(A) Meets minimum academic and progress standards adopted by the board of governors that fulfill the requirements outlined in this paragraph and paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive. Any minimum academic and progress standards adopted pursuant to this section shall be uniform across all community college districts and campuses. These standards shall not include a maximum unit cap, and community college districts and colleges shall not impose requirements for fee waiver eligibility other than the minimum academic and progress standards adopted by the board of governors and the requirements of subparagraph (B).

(B) Meets one of the following criteria:

(i) At the time of enrollment, is a recipient of benefits under the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program, the Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Payment Program, or a general assistance program.

(ii) Demonstrates eligibility according to income standards established by regulations of the board of governors.

(iii) Demonstrates financial need in accordance with the methodology set forth in federal law or regulation for determining the expected family contribution of students seeking financial aid.

(iv) At the time of enrollment, is a homeless youth or a former homeless youth as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 66025.9.

(2) (A) The board of
 governors, in consultation with students, faculty, and other key stakeholders, shall consider all of the following in the development and adoption of minimum academic and progress standards pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1):

(i) Minimum uniform academic and progress standards that do not unfairly disadvantage financially needy students in pursuing their education.

(ii) Criteria for reviewing extenuating circumstances and granting appeals that, at a minimum, take into account and do not penalize a student for circumstances outside the student’s control, such as reductions in student support services or changes to the economic situation of the student.

(iii) A process for reestablishing fee waiver eligibility that provides a student with a reasonable opportunity to continue or resume the student’s
 enrollment at a community college.

(B) To ensure that students are not unfairly impacted by the requirements of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), the board of governors shall establish a reasonable implementation period that commences no sooner than one year from adoption of the minimum academic and progress standards, or any subsequent changes to these standards, pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) and that is phased in to provide students adequate notification of this requirement and information about available support resources.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that minimum academic and progress standards adopted pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) be implemented only as campuses develop and implement the student support services and interventions necessary to ensure no disproportionate impact to students based on ethnicity, gender, disability, or
 socioeconomic status. The board of governors shall consider the ability of community college districts to meet the requirements of this paragraph before adopting minimum academic and progress standards, or any subsequent changes to these standards, pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).

(4) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that a student shall not lose fee waiver eligibility without a community college campus first demonstrating a reasonable effort to provide a student with adequate notification and assistance in maintaining the student’s fee waiver eligibility. The board of governors shall adopt regulations to implement this paragraph that ensure all of the following:

(A) Students are provided information about the available student support services to assist them in maintaining fee waiver eligibility.

(B) Community college district policies and course catalogs reflect the minimum academic and progress standards adopted pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) and that appropriate notice is provided to students before the policies are put into effect.

(C) A student does not lose fee waiver eligibility unless the student has not met minimum academic and progress standards adopted pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) for a period of no less than two consecutive academic terms.

(5) The board of governors shall provide notification of a proposed action to adopt regulations pursuant to this subdivision to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature in accordance with the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 70901.5. This notification shall include, but not be limited
 to, all of the following:

(A) The proposed minimum academic and progress standards and information detailing how the requirements of paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, have been or will be satisfied.

(B) How many students may lose fee waiver eligibility by ethnicity, gender, disability, and, to the extent relevant data is available, by socioeconomic status.

(C) The criteria for reviewing extenuating circumstances, granting appeals, and reestablishing fee waiver eligibility pursuant to paragraph (2).

(h) The fee requirements of this section shall be waived for any student who, at the time of enrollment, is a dependent or surviving spouse who has not remarried, of any member of the California National Guard who, in the line of duty and while in the active
 service of the state, was killed, died of a disability resulting from an event that occurred while in the active service of the state, or is permanently disabled as a result of an event that occurred while in the active service of the state. “Active service of the state,” for the purposes of this subdivision, refers to a member of the California National Guard activated pursuant to Section 146 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(i) The fee requirements of this section shall be waived for any student who is the surviving spouse or the child, natural or adopted, of a deceased person who met all of the requirements of Section 68120 or 68120.3.

(j) The fee requirements of this section shall be waived for any student in an undergraduate program, including a student who has previously graduated from another undergraduate or graduate program, who is the dependent of any individual killed
 in the September 11, 2001, terrorist attacks on the World Trade Center and the Pentagon or the crash of United Airlines Flight 93 in southwestern Pennsylvania, if that dependent meets the financial need requirements set forth in Section 69432.7 for the Cal Grant A Program and either of the following applies:

(1) The dependent was a resident of California on September 11, 2001.

(2) The individual killed in the attacks was a resident of California on September 11, 2001.

(k) A determination of whether a person is a resident of California on September 11, 2001, for purposes of subdivision (j) shall be based on the criteria set forth in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 68000) of Part 41 of Division 5 for determining nonresident and resident tuition.

(l) (1) “Dependent,” for purposes of subdivision (j), is a person who, because of the person’s relationship to an individual killed as a result of injuries sustained during the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, qualifies for compensation under the federal September 11th Victim Compensation Fund of 2001 (Title IV (commencing with Section 401) of Public Law 107-42).

(2) A dependent who is the surviving spouse of an individual killed in the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, is entitled to the waivers provided in this section until January 1, 2013.

(3) A dependent who is the surviving child, natural or adopted, of an individual killed in the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, is entitled to the waivers under subdivision (j) until that person attains 30 years of age.

(4) A dependent of an individual killed in the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, who is determined to be eligible by the California Victim Compensation Board, is also entitled to the waivers provided in this section until January 1, 2013.

(m) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that sufficient funds be provided to support the provision of a fee waiver for every student who demonstrates eligibility pursuant to subdivisions (g) to (j), inclusive.

(2) From funds provided in the annual Budget Act, the board of governors shall allocate to community college districts, pursuant to this subdivision, an amount equal to 2 percent of the fees waived pursuant to subdivisions (g) to (j), inclusive. From funds provided in the annual Budget Act, the board of governors shall allocate to community college districts, pursuant to this subdivision, an
 amount equal to ninety-one cents ($0.91) per credit unit waived pursuant to subdivisions (g) to (j), inclusive. It is the intent of the Legislature that funds provided pursuant to this subdivision be used to support the determination of financial need and delivery of student financial aid services, on the basis of the number of students for whom fees are waived. It also is the intent of the Legislature that the funds provided pursuant to this subdivision directly offset mandated costs claimed by community college districts pursuant to Commission on State Mandates consolidated Test Claims 99-TC-13 (Enrollment Fee Collection) and 00-TC-15 (Enrollment Fee Waivers). Funds allocated to a community college district for determination of financial need and delivery of student financial aid services shall supplement, and shall not supplant, the level of funds allocated for the administration of student financial aid programs during the 1992–93 fiscal year.

(n) (1) A community college district may use available emergency relief funds provided by the federal government to waive the fee requirements established pursuant to this section for a student who has not paid the fee due to the impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic.

(2) A community college district may use the authorization established pursuant to this subdivision only to waive the fees of students that are unpaid due to the impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic. A participating community college district shall first waive the unpaid fees of low-income students and students from underrepresented communities.

(o) The board of governors shall adopt regulations implementing this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 465, Sec. 5.   (AB 2973)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

76300.5.

(a) A district shall waive the fees of a student who is exempt from paying nonresident tuition under Section 68130.5, and who otherwise qualifies for a waiver under Section 76300, under regulations and procedures adopted by the board of governors. The Legislature finds and declares that this section is a state law within the meaning of Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 604, Sec. 4.   (AB 131)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Section operative January 1, 2013, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

76301.

Notwithstanding any other law, a community college district shall waive the fees of a student who is a victim of trafficking, domestic violence, and other serious crimes who has been granted a status under Section 1101(a)(15)(T)(i) or (ii), or Section 1101(a)(15)(U)(i) or (ii), of Title 8 of the United States Code to the same extent as individuals who are admitted to the United States as refugees under Section 1157 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 509, Sec. 3.   (AB 1899)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

76302.

(a) The governing board of the San Mateo County Community College District may adopt a policy that uses local unrestricted general funds to provide fee waivers to students with the greatest financial need, as determined by the community college district, when other fee waivers are not provided to those students. The policy shall include a requirement to prepare a fiscal impact statement, including a three-year projection of fiscal impact of the fee waiver on the community college district. The fiscal impact statement shall be presented at a public meeting of the governing board of the community college district and made available to the public.

(b) In addition to funding received pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 76396, the San Mateo County
 Community College District may use local unrestricted general funds to provide assistance to students for the total cost of attendance.

(c) The San Mateo County Community College District may use local unrestricted general funds for the purposes described in this section only for students who reside within the boundary of the community college district.

(d) On or before March 1, 2026, the governing board of the San Mateo Community College District shall submit a report to the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges, the Department of Finance, and the appropriate committees of the Legislature on the implementation of this section. The report shall include all of the following:

(1) How the district has determined to use local unrestricted general funds to support implementation of the California
 College Promise.

(2) How the district has determined to use local unrestricted general funds to assist students with the total cost of attendance.

(3) How the district has determined to use California College Promise funds to assist students with the total cost of attendance.

(4) A copy of the policy adopted by the governing board of the San Mateo Community College District pursuant to subdivision (a).

(5) A copy of the fiscal impact statement prepared pursuant to subdivision (a).

(6) The number and percentage of students receiving a fee waiver pursuant to this section, disaggregated by age, race and ethnicity, unit load, and income level.

(7) The number and percentage of students receiving a California Promise Grant, disaggregated by age, race and ethnicity, unit load, and income level.

(8) The number and percentage of students receiving other forms of institutional aid, including scholarships and grants, disaggregated by age, race and ethnicity, unit load, and income level.

(9) The services and programs that were limited or eliminated due to the implementation of this section.

(e) For purposes of this section, the total cost of attendance for a student attending a community college shall be defined to include the student’s tuition and fees, books and supplies, living expenses, transportation expenses, and any other student expenses used to calculate a student’s financial need for purposes of
 federal Title IV student aid programs.

(f) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2028, and as of January 1, 2029, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 937, Sec. 1.   (SB 893)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Inoperative July 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

76303.

(a) The governing board of the West Valley-Mission Community College District may adopt a policy that uses local unrestricted general funds to provide fee waivers to students with the greatest financial need, as determined by the community college district, when other fee waivers are not provided to those students. The policy shall include a requirement to prepare a fiscal impact statement, including a three-year projection of the fiscal impact of the fee waiver on the community college district. The fiscal impact statement shall be presented at a public meeting of the governing board of the community college district and made available to the public.

(b) In addition to funding received pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 76396, the West Valley-Mission Community
 College District may use local unrestricted general funds to provide assistance to students for the total cost of attendance.

(c) The West Valley-Mission Community College District may use local unrestricted general funds for the purposes described in this section only for students who reside within the boundary of the community college district.

(d) On or before March 1, 2028, the governing board of the West Valley-Mission Community College District shall submit a report to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the Department of Finance, and the appropriate committees of the Legislature on the implementation of this section. The report shall include all of the following:

(1) How the district has determined to use local unrestricted general funds to support implementation of the
 California College Promise.

(2) How the district has determined to use local unrestricted general funds to assist students with the total cost of attendance.

(3) How the district has determined to use California College Promise funds to assist students with the total cost of attendance.

(4) A copy of the policy adopted by the governing board of the West Valley-Mission Community College District pursuant to subdivision (a).

(5) A copy of the fiscal impact statement prepared pursuant to subdivision (a).

(6) The number and percentage of students receiving a fee waiver pursuant to this section, disaggregated by age, race and ethnicity, unit load, and income level.

(7) The number and percentage of students receiving a California Promise Grant, disaggregated by age, race and ethnicity, unit load, and income level.

(8) The number and percentage of students receiving other forms of institutional aid, including scholarships and grants, disaggregated by age, race and ethnicity, unit load, and income level.

(9) The services and programs that were limited or eliminated due to the implementation of this section.

(e) For purposes of this section, the total cost of attendance for a student attending a community college shall be defined to include the student’s tuition and fees, books and supplies, living expenses, transportation expenses, and any other student expenses used to calculate a student’s financial need for purposes
 of federal Title IV student aid programs.

(f) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2030, and, as of January 1, 2031, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 67.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2030, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Authorized Fees [76350. - 76395.]

76350.

Except as provided in Section 3074.7 of the Labor Code, no charges or fees shall be required to be paid by a resident or nonresident apprentice, or by his or her parent or guardian, for admission or attendance in any course of activity or community college course that is offered pursuant to Section 3074 of the Labor Code in accordance with the instructional hours requirements and course requirements specified in Section 3078 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 21.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

76355.

(a) (1) The governing board of a district maintaining a community college may require community college students to pay a fee in the total amount of not more than ten dollars ($10) for each semester, seven dollars ($7) for summer school, seven dollars ($7) for each intersession of at least four weeks, or seven dollars ($7) for each quarter for health supervision and services, including direct or indirect medical and hospitalization services, or the operation of a student health center or centers, or both.

(2) The governing board of each community college district may increase this fee by the same percentage increase as the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchase of Goods and Services. Whenever that calculation produces an increase of one dollar ($1) above the existing fee, the fee may be increased by one dollar ($1).

(b) If, pursuant to this section, a fee is required, the governing board of the district shall decide the amount of the fee, if any, that a part-time student is required to pay. The governing board may decide whether the fee shall be mandatory or optional.

(c) The governing board of a district maintaining a community college shall adopt rules and regulations that exempt the following students from any fee required pursuant to subdivision (a):

(1) Students who depend exclusively upon prayer for healing in accordance with the teachings of a bona fide religious sect, denomination, or organization.

(2) Students who are attending a community college under an approved apprenticeship training program.

(d) (1) All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the fund of the district designated by the California Community Colleges Budget and Accounting Manual. These fees shall be expended only to provide health services as specified in regulations adopted by the board of governors.

(2) Authorized expenditures shall not include, among other things, athletic trainers’ salaries, athletic insurance, medical supplies for athletics, physical examinations for intercollegiate athletics, ambulance services, the salaries of health professionals for athletic events, any deductible portion of accident claims filed for athletic team members, or any other expense that is not available to all students. No student shall be denied a service supported by student health fees on account of participation in athletic programs.
